pt-PT: Compatibilidade de docking: Acoplável sem remover a capa; Não aplicável (consola apenas portátil); Requer remoção para acoplar; Outro
sl-SI: Združljivost s postajo: Priklopljivo brez odstranitve ohišja; Ni primerno (samo ročna konzola); Zahteva odstranitev za priklop; Drugo
nb: Dokkingkompatibilitet: Kan dokkes uten å fjerne deksel; Ikke aktuelt (kun håndholdt konsoll); Krever fjerning for dokking; Annet
vi: Khả năng tương thích đế cắm: Gắn được mà không cần tháo vỏ; Không áp dụng (máy chơi game chỉ cầm tay); Cần tháo vỏ để gắn; Khác
it: Compatibilità docking: Agganciabile senza rimuovere la custodia; Non applicabile (console solo portatile); Richiede rimozione per aggancio; Altro
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost priključne stanice: Može se priključiti bez skidanja kućišta; Nije primjenjivo (samo ručna konzola); Zahtijeva skidanje za priključivanje; Ostalo
fr: Compatibilité avec la station d’accueil: Peut être mis sur station d'accueil sans retirer l'étui; Non applicable (console portable seulement); Nécessite le retrait pour mise sur station d'accueil; Autre
es: Compatibilidad con base: Acoplable sin quitar la funda; No aplica (consola solo portátil); Requiere extracción para acoplar; Otros
bg-BG: Съвместимост с докинг станцията: Докване без премахване на кейса; Неприложимо (само преносима конзола); Изисква премахване за докване; Други
pt-BR: Compatibilidade de acoplamento: Compatível com dock sem remover a capa; Não aplicável (console exclusivamente portátil); Requer remoção para encaixe no dock; Outro
de: Docking-Kompatibilität: Dockbar ohne Gehäuseentfernung; Nicht zutreffend (nur Handheld-Konsole); Erfordert Entfernung zum Docken; Sonstiges
da: Docking-kompatibilitet: Kan dockes uden at fjerne cover; Ikke relevant (kun håndholdt konsol); Kræver fjernelse for dockning; Andet
sk-SK: Kompatibilita s dokovacou stanicou: Dokovateľný bez odstránenia puzdra; Neaplikovateľné (iba ručná konzola); Vyžaduje odstránenie pre dokovanie; Iné
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของแท่นวาง: เชื่อมต่อได้โดยไม่ต้องถอดเคส; ไม่เกี่ยวข้อง (คอนโซลมือถือเท่านั้น); ต้องถอดออกเพื่อเชื่อมต่อ; อื่นๆ
sv: Dockningskompatibilitet: Dockningsbar utan att ta bort fodral; Ej tillämplig (endast handhållen konsol); Kräver borttagning för dockning; Övrigt
en: Docking compatibility: Dockable without removing case; Not applicable (handheld-only console); Requires removal for docking; Other
fi: Telakointiyhteensopivuus: Telakoitavissa ilman kotelon poistamista; Ei sovellettavissa (vain käsikonsolit); Vaatii poistamisen telakointia varten; Muu
lt-LT: Dokavimo suderinamumas: Prijungiama nenuimant dėklo; Netaikoma (tik rankinė konsolė); Prijungimui reikia nuimti; Kita
tr: Yerleştirme uyumluluğu: Kılıf çıkarılmadan yerleştirilebilir; Uygulanamaz (sadece el tipi konsol); Yerleştirme için çıkarılması gerekir; Diğer
hu: Dokkolókompatibilitás: Dokkolható tok eltávolítása nélkül; Nem alkalmazható (csak kézi konzol); Dokkoláshoz eltávolítás szükséges; Egyéb
zh-TW: 底座相容性: 可帶殼對接; 不適用（純掌機）; 需移除外殼才能對接; 其他
el: Συμβατότητα σύνδεσης: Συμβατό με docking χωρίς αφαίρεση θήκης; Δεν εφαρμόζεται (κονσόλα μόνο χειρός); Απαιτεί αφαίρεση για docking; Άλλο
zh-CN: 底座兼容性: 无需取下保护壳即可对接; 不适用（仅掌机）; 对接时需要取下; 其他
ru: Совместимость с док-станцией: Стыкуется без снятия чехла; Не применимо (только портативная консоль); Требует снятия для стыковки; Другой
cs: Kompatibilita s dokovací stanicí: Dokovatelná bez odstranění pouzdra; Nepoužitelné (pouze ruční konzole); Vyžaduje odstranění pro dokování; Jiné
ko: 도킹 호환성: 케이스 제거 없이 도킹 가능; 해당 없음 (휴대 전용 콘솔); 도킹 시 제거 필요; 기타
ja: ドッキング互換性: ケース装着のままドッキング可能; 該当なし（携帯専用コンソール）; ドッキング時は取り外し必要; その他
pl: Kompatybilność ze stacją dokującą: Dokowalne bez zdejmowania etui; Nie dotyczy (konsola tylko ręczna); Wymaga zdjęcia do dokowania; Inne
nl: Docking compatibiliteit: Dockbaar zonder hoesje te verwijderen; Niet van toepassing (alleen draagbare console); Vereist verwijdering voor docken; Andere
ro-RO: Compatibilitate andocare: Poate fi andocat fără îndepărtarea carcasei; Nu se aplică (consolă doar portabilă); Necesită îndepărtare pentru andocare; Altele